Washington statutes.
RCW 10.19.170

Violent offenders—Reasons for release without bail.

Notwithstanding CrR 3.2, a court who releases a defendant arrested or charged with a violent offense as defined in RCW 9.94A.030 on the offender's personal recognizance or personal recognizance with conditions must state on the record the reasons why the court did not require the defendant to post bail.

[ 1996 c 181 s 1.]